District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.09

Alternative sanctions.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1009, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3310.9.